Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska81-15,157
Loans; procedures for granting.

Loans shall be granted for projects in accordance with the procedures established through the state's continuing planning process pursuant to sections 205(j), 208, 303(e), and 320 of the Clean Water Act and for projects listed on the state's priority list under section 216 of the Clean Water Act.

Laws 1988, LB 766, § 11.